Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,110
Local housing agency; dissolution; effect on area of operation.

After any dissolution and transfer, notwithstanding anything contained in section 71-1588, the area of operation of the receiving local housing agency shall include, nonexclusively, the area of operation of the transferring local housing agency.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 39.